Louisiana, session 2026, HB1043.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:2561.2(A) and 2562.2(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§2561.2. Civil jurisdiction
A. Subject to the limitations provided in R.S. 13:2561.4, this court has civil
jurisdiction concurrent with that of the district court, within its territorial boundaries,
when the amount in dispute, or the value of the property involved, does not exceed
twenty fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorney fees, and in
suits for possession of leased premises when the amount of the rental does not
exceed the jurisdictional amounts provided in Code of Civil Procedure Article
4844(A); and in case of any reconventional demand, intervention, or third-party
opposition filed in the court and necessarily connected with or growing out of the
main demand, the court shall be divested of jurisdiction over the main demand and
all of the incidental demands when the amount in dispute or the value of the property
involved in the reconventional demand, intervention, or third-party opposition
exceeds twenty fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorney fees,
and the case shall be removed to the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District Court.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1043 ENROLLED
§2562.2. Civil jurisdiction
A. Subject to the limitations provided in R.S. 13:2562.4, this court has civil
jurisdiction concurrent with that of the district court, within its territorial boundaries,
when the amount in dispute, or the value of the property involved, does not exceed
twenty fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorney fees and in
suits for possession of leased premises when the amount of the rental does not
exceed the jurisdictional amounts provided in Code of Civil Procedure Article
4844(A); and in case of any reconventional demand, intervention, or third-party
opposition filed in the court and necessarily connected with or growing out of the
main demand, the court shall be divested of jurisdiction over the main demand and
all of the incidental demands when the amount in dispute or the value of the property
involved in the reconventional demand, intervention, or third-party opposition
exceeds twenty fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorney fees,
and the case shall be removed to the Twenty-Fourth Judicial District Court.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.